District of Columbia statutes.
47-1808.12

Tax on unincorporated businesses — Credits — Tax credit for farm to food donations.

(a)

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, any qualified unincorporated business under § 6-1504 may claim a nonrefundable credit against taxes imposed by this subchapter equal to 50% of the value of food commodity donations made during the tax year to a District of Columbia food bank or shelter recognized as a tax-exempt organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

(b)

(1)

The credit shall not exceed $ 5,000 per unincorporated business per tax year and shall not reduce the minimum tax liability under § 47-1808.03(b).

(2)

If the unincorporated business elects to claim the credit for a contribution, no deduction under § 47-1803.03(a)(8) shall be allowable on account of the contribution.

(c)

A donated food commodity shall not be damaged, out-of-condition, nor of a condition that would be considered unfit for human consumption under District or federal law or regulations.

(d)

An unincorporated business claiming the tax credit shall provide documentation supporting the tax credit claim in a form and manner prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer.

(e)

For the purposes of this section, the term “food commodity” means vegetables, fruits, grains, mushrooms, honey, herbs, nuts, seeds, or rootstock grown in the District by urban farming, as defined in § 48-401(5), or by a community garden, as defined in § 48-401(1), that are intended to be used as food in its perishable state and are approved by regulatory authorities.

Apr. 30, 2015, D.C. Law 20-248, § 201(c)(4), 62 DCR 1504

Section 301 of D.C. Law 20-248 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to create a governmental liability or cause of action against the District related to the safety of food purchased on District lands by non-governmental entities.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-248: Section 6183 of D.C. Law 21-36 removed the funding requirement and other applicability restrictions in D.C. Law 20-248, § 302, as enacted.